Odia_apertium_morph_dict.dix
<pardef n="/ApaNa__p">
<e><p><l>ApaNa</l><r>ApaNa<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="prsg:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ApaNafku</l><r>ApaNa<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:fku"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ApaNafka</l><r>ApaNa<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:fka"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ApaNafkara</l><r>ApaNa<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:fkara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ApaNafka_xbArA</l><r>ApaNa<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:fka_xbArA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ApaNafka_TAru</l><r>ApaNa<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:fkaTAru"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ApaNafka_TAre</l><r>ApaNa<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:fkaTAre"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ApaNamAne</l><r>ApaNa<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="prsg:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ApaNamAnafku</l><r>ApaNa<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:fku"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ApaNamAnafka</l><r>ApaNa<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:fka"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ApaNamAnafkara</l><r>ApaNa<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:fkara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ApaNamAnafka_xbArA</l><r>ApaNa<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:fka_xbArA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ApaNamAnafkaTAru</l><r>ApaNa<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:fkaTAru"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ApaNamAnafkaTAre</l><r>ApaNa<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:fkaTAre"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ApaNamAnafka_pAiz</l><r>ApaNa<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:fka_pAiz"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>

<pardef n="y/ie__p">
<e><p><l>ie</l><r>ie<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="prsg:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>ie<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="prsg:0"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>AhAku</l><r>ie<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:ku"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AhAfku</l><r>ie<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:fku"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AhAra</l><r>ie<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:ra"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AhA</l><r>ie<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:ra"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AhAfka</l><r>ie<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:fka"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AhAxbArA</l><r>ie<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:xbArA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AhATAru</l><r>ie<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:TAru"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AhATAre</l><r>ie<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:TAre"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>euzmAne</l><r>ie<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="prsg:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oumAne</l><r>ie<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="prsg:0"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>oumAnafku</l><r>ie<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:fku"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>euzmAnafku</l><r>ie<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:fku"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AhAfku</l><r>ie<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:fku"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>euzmAnafka</l><r>ie<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:fka"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>euzmAnafkara</l><r>ie<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:fkara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AhAfkara</l><r>ie<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:fkara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>euzmAnafka_xbArA</l><r>ie<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:fka_xbArA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AhAfka_xbArA</l><r>ie<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:fka_xbArA"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>euzmAnafkaTAru</l><r>ie<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:fkaTAru"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AhAfkaTAru</l><r>ie<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:fkaTAru"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>euzmAnafkaTAre</l><r>ie<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:fkaTAre"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>mAnafkaTAre</l><r>ie<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:fkaTAre"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>euzmAnafka_pAiz</l><r>ie<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:fka_pAiz"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="k/ie__p">
<e><p><l>ie</l><r>ie<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="prsg:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AhAku</l><r>ie<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:ku"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AhAra</l><r>ie<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:ra"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AhA</l><r>ie<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:ra"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AhAxbArA</l><r>ie<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:xbArA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AhATAru</l><r>ie<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:TAru"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AhATAre</l><r>ie<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:TAre"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>euzmAne</l><r>ie<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="prsg:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oumAne</l><r>ie<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="prsg:0"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>oumAnafku</l><r>ie<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:fku"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>euzmAnafku</l><r>ie<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:fku"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AhAfku</l><r>ie<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:fku"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>euzmAnafka</l><r>ie<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:fka"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>euzmAnafkara</l><r>ie<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:fkara"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>euzmAnafka_xbArA</l><r>ie<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:fka_xbArA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>euzmAnafkaTAru</l><r>ie<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:fkaTAru"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>euzmAnafkaTAre</l><r>ie<s n="cat:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="prsg:fkaTAre"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
</pardefs>

<e lm="ApaNa"><i></i><par n="/ApaNa__p"/></e>
<e lm="yie"><i>y</i><par n="y/ie__p"/></e>
<e lm="kie"><i>k</i><par n="k/ie__p"/></e>
